Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 28 Broadband Deployment and Investment Act

39-28-1.
Findings.

The Rhode Island general assembly finds that growth and enhancement of services using internet protocol technology provide Rhode Island consumers more choice in voice, data, and video services than at any other time. The proliferation of new technologies and applications and the growing number of providers developing and offering innovative services using internet protocol are due in large part to little barrier to investment, including freedom from state laws and regulations governing traditional telephone service, that these technologies have enjoyed in Rhode Island, as well as recognition that federal law is more uniform in its oversight of internet protocol-enabled services. The economic benefits, including consumer choice, new jobs, and significant capital investment, will be jeopardized and competition minimized by the imposition of traditional state entry, rate, and service-term regulation on voice over internet protocol service and internet protocol-enabled service.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 94, § 1.

39-28-2.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Voice over internet protocol service” or “VoIP service” means any service that:

Enables real-time, two-way voice communications that originate from or terminate at the user’s location in internet protocol or any successor protocol;

Uses a broadband connection from the user’s location; and

Permits users generally to receive calls that originate on the public switched telephone network and to terminate calls to the public switched telephone network.

“Internet protocol-enabled service” or “IP-enabled service” means any service, capability, functionality, or application provided, except that as provided in subsection (1), using internet protocol, or any successor protocol, that enables an end-user to send or receive a communication in internet protocol format or any successor format.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 94, § 1.

39-28-3.
Regulation.

Notwithstanding any general or public law to the contrary, and with the exception of the provisions of §

39-28-4

, no department, agency, commission, or political subdivision of Rhode Island shall enact, adopt, or enforce, either directly or indirectly, any law, rule, regulation, ordinance, standard, order, or other provision having the force or effect of law that regulates, or has the effect of regulating, the entry, rates, terms, or conditions of VoIP service or IP-enabled service.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 94, § 1.

39-28-4.
Unaffected fees.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to affect, mandate, or prohibit the assessment of nondiscriminatory enhanced 911 fees, telecommunications relay service fees, or the telecommunications education access fund surcharge under §

39-1-61

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 94, § 1.

39-28-5.
Rights or obligations of carriers.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to modify or affect the rights or obligations of any carrier pursuant to 47 U.S.C. § 251 or 47 U.S.C. § 252.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 94, § 1.

39-28-6.
Effect on tax obligations or authority.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to modify or affect any tax obligations imposed by §

44-13-4

or the authority of the department of revenue to enforce any such obligations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 94, § 1.

39-28-7.
No derogation of attorney general.

Nothing in this chapter shall derogate from the common law or statutory authority of the attorney general, nor shall any provision be construed as a limitation on the common law or statutory authority of the attorney general, including, but not limited to, the authority to enforce consumer protection or unfair or deceptive trade practice statutes and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 94, § 1.